Hawaii, session 2025, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that 2024 marks the two‑hundred thirty-fifth anniversary of the first arrival of Asian immigrant workers in the State.  As of July 1, 2022, approximately 37.1 per cent of the State's population, over five hundred thousand residents, were of Asian descent. The legislature recognizes that the Asian community in Hawaii has made significant contributions to the State's social, civic, and economic success, as well as its diverse and vibrant culture, which includes the celebration of the Lunar New Year. The Lunar New Year is joyously observed by numerous residents in the State and is celebrated by more than two-thirds of Chinese, Korean, Japanese, and Vietnamese Americans across the United States.  The Lunar New Year provides a time to renew one's family ties; reflect upon the past year; and wish for good fortune, health, and prosperity in the year ahead. The legislature also finds that the United States House of Representatives introduced resolutions recognizing the cultural and historical significance of the Lunar New Year in 2021 and 2023; California recognized the Lunar New Year as a state holiday in 2022; and New York recognized the Lunar New Year as a public-school holiday in 2023. The legislature further finds that, by establishing the Lunar New Year as a state holiday in Hawaii, the State can honor its rich cultural history, demonstrate its commitment to cultural diversity, and extend its best wishes for peace and prosperity to all who celebrate this important occasion. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Designate the day of the second new moon after the winter solstice of each year as the Lunar New Year; and (2)  Establish the Lunar New Year as a state holiday. SECTION 2.  Section 8-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§8-1  Holidays designated.  The following days of each year are set apart and established as state holidays: The first day in January, New Year's Day; The third Monday in January, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Day; The day of the second new moon after the winter solstice, Lunar New Year; The third Monday in February, Presidents' Day; The twenty-sixth day in March, Prince Jonah Kuhio Kalanianaole Day; The Friday preceding Easter Sunday, Good Friday; The last Monday in May, Memorial Day; The eleventh day in June, King Kamehameha I Day; The fourth day in July, Independence Day; The third Friday in August, Statehood Day; The first Monday in September, Labor Day; The eleventh day in November, Veterans' Day; The fourth Thursday in November, Thanksgiving Day; The twenty-fifth day in December, Christmas Day; All election days, except primary and special election days, in the county wherein the election is held; and Any day designated by proclamation by the President of the United States or by the governor as a holiday." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________